Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-935
Fraudulently filing a financing statement,
lien, or document; penalty.

(1) A person commits
the offense of fraudulently filing a financing statement, lien, or document
if the person directly, or through an intermediary, submits for filing or
recording in the public record, as defined in section 28-911:

(a) Any document
purporting to create a nonconsensual common-law lien, as defined in section
52-1901, knowing or having reason to know that the lien is a nonconsensual
common-law lien;

(b) A financing statement pursuant to article 9, Uniform Commercial
Code, knowing or having reason to know that the financing statement is not
based on a bona fide security agreement or was not authorized or authenticated
by the alleged debtor identified in the financing statement or an authorized
representative of the alleged debtor; or

(c) Any document filed in an attempt to
harass an entity, individual, or public official or obstruct a government
operation or judicial proceeding, knowing or having reason to know such document
contained false information.

(2) Fraudulently filing a financing statement, lien, or document
is a Class IV felony.

(3) Lack of belief in the jurisdiction or authority of the state
or of the government of the United States is no defense to prosecution under
this section.

Laws 2013, LB3, § 2.